Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1134
Department; employment facilities; rules and regulations.

The department, with the recommendation of the board, may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations providing for employment or work-setting facilities required for the provision of dental services by a licensed dental hygienist.

Laws 1986, LB 572, § 7;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 418;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 76;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-193.20;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 467.